Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB613.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 75.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [(a) ]Upon the creation of a fire protection district or a volunteer fire department
district as provided in KRS 75.010 to 75.031, the board of trustees established
under KRS 75.031 may[of a district are authorized to] establish and operate a fire
department and emergency ambulance service as provided in subsection (7)[(6)] of
this section.
(2) (a) The board of trustees established under KRS 75.031 may[and to] levy a tax
upon the property in the district. Property that may be taxed includes property
within cities in a fire protection district or a volunteer fire department district:
1. As provided by KRS 75.022; or
2. Within the metes and bounds of a city that does not maintain a regular
fire department as defined by KRS 95.010(3)(b).
The property taxed shall be subject to county tax, and except as provided in
Section 2 of this Act, the tax levied by the district shall not exceed ten cents
($0.10) per one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county
taxes, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the establishment,
maintenance, and operation of the fire department or to make contracts for fire
protection for the districts as provided in KRS 75.050. The rate set in this
subsection shall not be subject to[apply, notwithstanding the provisions of]
KRS 132.023.
(b) Except as provided in Section 2 of this Act, a fire protection district or a
volunteer fire department district that establishes and operates an emergency
ambulance service and is the primary service provider in the district may levy
a tax upon the property in the district not to exceed twenty cents ($0.20) per
one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for the
Page 1 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
purpose of defraying the expenses of the establishment, maintenance, and
operation of the fire department and emergency ambulance service or to make
contracts for fire protection for the districts as provided in KRS 75.050. The
rate set in this subsection shall not be subject to[apply, notwithstanding the
provisions of] KRS 132.023.
(3)[(2)] The establishment, maintenance, and operation of a fire protection district or
volunteer fire department district shall include, but not be limited to, the following
activities:
(a) Acquisition and maintenance of adequate fire protection facilities;
(b) Acquisition and maintenance of adequate firefighting equipment;
(c) Recruitment, training, and supervision of firefighters;
(d) Control and extinguishment of fires;
(e) Prevention of fires;
(f) Conducting fire safety activities;
(g) Payment of compensation to firefighters and providing the necessary support
and supervisory personnel;
(h) Payment for reasonable benefits or a nominal fee to volunteer firefighters
when benefits and fees do not constitute wages or salaries under KRS Chapter
337 and are not taxable as income to the volunteer firefighters under
Kentucky or federal income tax laws; and
(i) The use of fire protection district equipment for activities which are for a
public purpose and which do not materially diminish the value of the
equipment.
(4)[(3)] The property valuation administrator of the county or counties involved, with
the cooperation of the board of trustees, shall note on the tax rolls the taxpayers and
valuation of the property subject to such assessment. The county clerk shall
compute the tax on the regular state and county tax bills in such manner as may be
Page 2 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
directed by regulation of the Department of Revenue.
(5)[(4)] Such taxes shall be subject to the same delinquency date, discounts, penalties,
and interest as are applied to the collection of ad valorem taxes and shall be
collected by the sheriff of the county or counties involved and accounted for to the
treasurer of the district. The sheriff shall be entitled to a fee of one percent (1%) of
the amount collected by him or her.
(6)[(5)] Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the trustees
of a fire protection district located in a city or county which provides emergency
ambulance service from using funds derived from taxes for the purpose of
providing supplemental emergency medical services so long as the mayor of the
city or the county judge/executive of the county, as appropriate, certifies to the
trustees in writing that supplemental emergency medical services are reasonably
required in the public interest. For the purposes of this subsection, "supplemental
emergency medical services" may include EMT, EMT-D, and paramedic services
rendered at the scene of an emergent accident or illness until an emergency
ambulance can arrive at the scene.
(7)[(6)] The board of trustees of a[ those] fire protection district[districts] or volunteer
fire department district,[districts whose districts] or a portion[portions] thereof,
that does[do] not receive emergency ambulance services from an emergency
ambulance service district, or[,] whose district is[districts are] not being served by
an emergency ambulance service operated or contracted by a city or county
government, may develop, maintain, and operate or contract for an emergency
ambulance service as part of any fire department created pursuant to this chapter.
No taxes levied pursuant to subsection (2)[(1)] of this section shall be used to
develop, maintain, operate, or contract for an emergency ambulance service until
the tax year following the year the board of trustees of the district
authorizes[authorize] the establishment of the emergency ambulance service.
Page 3 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 75 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board of trustees of a fire protection district or a volunteer fire department
district may exceed the maximum tax rate established in Section 1 of this Act if
the requirements of this section are satisfied.
(2) (a) The board of trustees of a fire protection district or a volunteer fire
department district proposing to levy a tax rate that exceeds both the
maximum tax rate established in Section 1 of this Act and the rate levied for
the immediately preceding calendar year shall hold a public hearing within
thirty (30) days of proposing the levy to hear comments from the public
regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be open to the public,
and all persons desiring to be heard shall be given an opportunity to present
oral testimony.
(b) Notification of the public hearing shall be advertised for two (2) consecutive
weeks in a newspaper pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 and on the website of
the fire protection district or volunteer fire department district. If the district
does not have a website, the notification shall be advertised on the website
of the local government in which the fire protection district or volunteer fire
department district is located. The notification shall provide:
1. The tax rate levied for the immediately preceding calendar year, and
the revenue produced by that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current calendar year and the revenue
expected to be produced by that rate;
3. A time and place for the public hearing;
4. The purpose of the public hearing;
5. The purpose of the tax rate increase, which shall be related to
protecting life and property by:
Page 4 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
a. Responding to fires;
b. Conducting fire prevention education; or
c. Providing emergency medical or rescue services to the
community; and
6. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained
therein.
(c) If the board of trustees of a fire protection district or a volunteer fire
department district fails to comply with the public hearing requirements in
this subsection, the proposed tax rate shall not go into effect and the tax rate
from the immediately preceding calendar year shall be levied.
(d) The rates set in this subsection shall not be subject to KRS 132.023.
(e) Except for the rate initially levied upon the creation of the fire protection
district or volunteer fire department district, any increase of the total tax
shall not exceed the tax rate levied for the immediately preceding calendar
year by more than two cents ($0.02) per one hundred dollars ($100) of
assessed valuation.
(3) In addition to the hearing and notification requirements in subsection (2) of this
section, any increase of the total tax that is proposed to be levied shall be subject
to recall as provided in subsections (4) to (6) of this section.
(4) (a) The portion of the tax rate that is in excess of the rate levied for the
immediately preceding calendar year shall go into effect forty-five (45) days
after its passage by the board of trustees.
(b) During the same forty-five (45) day time period provided by paragraph (a)
of this subsection, any three (3) qualified voters who reside in the fire
protection district or volunteer fire department district, may commence
petition proceedings to protest the increase in the tax rate by filing an
Page 5 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
affidavit with the county clerk, which states:
1. The three (3) qualified voters constitute the members of the petition
committee;
2. The petition committee will be responsible for circulating the petition;
3. The petition committee will file the petition in the proper form within
the same forty-five (45) day time period provided by paragraph (a) of
this subsection;
4. The names and addresses of the petition committee members;
5. The address to which all notices to the committee are to be sent; and
6. Whether or not the petition committee is willing to incur all of the
expenses associated with the electronic petition signatures. If the
petition committee is not willing to incur all of the expenses, then
electronic petition signatures shall not be allowed for the petition.
(c) Upon receipt of the affidavit, the county clerk shall immediately:
1. Notify the petition committee of all statutory requirements for the
filing of a valid petition under this section;
2. Notify the petition committee that the county clerk will publish a
notice identifying the tax levy being challenged and providing the
names and addresses of the petition committee in a newspaper of
general circulation within the county if:
a. There is a newspaper within the county in which to publish the
notice; and
b. The petition committee remits an amount equal to the cost of
publishing the notice determined in accordance with KRS
424.160 at the time of filing the affidavit.
If the petition committee elects to have the notice published, the
county clerk shall publish the notice within five (5) days of receipt of
Page 6 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
the affidavit; and
3. Deliver a copy of the affidavit to the board of trustees of the fire
protection district or volunteer fire department district proposing to
levy the tax.
(d) The petition shall meet the following requirements:
1. All papers of the petition shall be substantially uniform in size and
style and shall be assembled in one (1) instrument for filing;
2. Each sheet of the petition may contain the names of voters from more
than one (1) voting precinct;
3. Each nonelectronic petition signature shall be executed in ink or
indelible pencil;
4. Each electronic petition signature shall comply with the requirements
of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, KRS 369.101 to 369.120;
5. Each petition signature shall be followed by the printed name, street
address, birth month, and birth year of the person signing; and
6. a. The petition shall be signed by a number of registered and
qualified voters who reside in the fire protection district or
volunteer fire department district equal to at least ten percent
(10%) of the total number of votes cast in the last preceding
presidential election.
b. Electronic petition signatures shall be included in determining
whether the required number of petition signatures has been
obtained when:
i. The expenses associated with the electronic petition
signatures have been incurred in accordance with
paragraph (b)6. of this subsection; and
ii. The electronic petition signatures comply with the
Page 7 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
requirements of this subsection.
c. The inclusion of an invalid petition signature on a page shall not
invalidate the entire page of the petition, but shall instead result
in the invalid petition signature being stricken and not counted.
(e) Upon the filing of the petition with the county clerk, the measure passed by
the board of trustees levying the increased tax rate shall be suspended from
going into effect until after the election referred to in subsection (5) of this
section is held, or until the petition is finally determined to be insufficient
and no further action may be taken pursuant to paragraph (i) of this
subsection.
(f) The county clerk shall immediately notify the chair of the board of trustees
that the petition has been received and shall, within thirty (30) days of the
receipt of the petition, make a determination of whether the petition
contains enough signatures of qualified voters to place the measure levying
the tax rate before those persons eligible to vote for elective offices of the
members of the board of trustees in the elections held under KRS 75.031.
(g) If the county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient, the clerk shall certify to
the petition committee and the board of trustees within the thirty (30) day
period provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection that the petition is
properly presented and in compliance with this section, and that the
measure of the board of trustees levying the tax rate will be placed before
those persons eligible to vote for elective offices of the members of the board
of trustees in the elections held under KRS 75.031.
(h) If the county clerk finds the petition to be insufficient, the clerk shall, within
the thirty (30) day period provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection
notify, in writing, the petition committee and the board of trustees of the
specific deficiencies found. Notification shall be sent by certified mail and
Page 8 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
shall be published at least one (1) time in a newspaper of general
circulation within the county containing the fire protection district or
volunteer fire department district. If there is not a newspaper within the
county in which to publish the notification, then the notification shall be
posted at the courthouse door.
(i) A final determination of the sufficiency of a petition shall be subject to final
review by the Circuit Court of the county in which the fire protection district
or volunteer fire department district is located, and shall be limited to the
validity of the county clerk's determination. Any petition challenging the
county clerk's final determination shall be filed within ten (10) days of the
issuance of the county clerk's final determination.
(j) The board of trustees may cause the cancellation of the election by
reconsidering and amending the measure levying the tax rate to a rate equal
to or lower than the previous year's rate. The action by the board of trustees
shall be valid only if taken within fifteen (15) days following the date the
county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient.
(5) (a) If an election is necessary under subsection (4) of this section:
1. The board of trustees shall cause to be submitted to those persons
eligible to vote for elective offices of the members of the board of
trustees in the elections held under KRS 75.031 the question as to
whether the property tax rate shall be levied;
2. This question shall be advertised in accordance with KRS 424.120 and
shall be advertised at least thirty (30) days prior to the election held to
elect the elective offices of members of the board of trustees under
KRS 75.031. The question shall also appear on the website of the fire
protection district or volunteer fire department district. If the district
does not have a website, the notification shall be advertised on the
Page 9 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
website of the local government in which the fire protection district or
volunteer fire department district is located;
3. The vote shall occur at the election held to elect the elective offices of
members of the board of trustees under KRS 75.031 on the fourth
Saturday of June;
4. The board of trustees shall ensure that the ballots are secure and are
counted and retained by two (2) or more persons who shall count and
report the results to the chair of the board of trustees; and
5. All ballots and other materials pertinent to the election shall be
retained by the board of trustees for twenty-two (22) months after the
election day, after which time they shall be destroyed in a manner to
render them unreadable by the board of trustees if no contest or
recount action has been filed. The board of trustees shall, by bylaw,
establish methods for contests and recount actions.
(b) In an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the question
shall be framed to ask whether the persons eligible to vote for elective
offices of the members of the board of trustees in the elections held under
KRS 75.031 are for the levy of the property tax rate. If a majority of the
votes cast upon the question oppose its passage, the measure of the board of
trustees levying the tax rate shall not go into effect. If a majority of the votes
cast upon the question favor its passage, the measure shall become effective.
(c) If the measure of the board of trustees levying the tax rate fails to pass
pursuant to an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
property tax rate from the previous year shall be levied without further
approval by the board of trustees.
(d) Local, state, and federal tax dollars shall not be used to advocate, in partial
terms, for or against any public question that appears on the ballot under
Page 10 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
this subsection. For purposes of this paragraph, "local" means and
includes any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local
government, unified local government, charter county, or special district.
(6) Notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary, if a board of trustees of a
fire protection district or volunteer fire department district has not established a
final tax rate as of September 15 due to the recall provisions of this section:
(a) Regular tax bills shall be prepared as required in KRS 132.017 and 133.220
for all districts having a tax rate established by that date; and
(b) A second set of bills shall be prepared and collected in the regular manner
in accordance with KRS Chapter 132 upon establishment of the final tax
rate by the district.
(7) If a second billing is necessary, the collection period shall be extended to conform
with the second billing date.
(8) All costs associated with the second billing shall be paid by the fire protection
district or volunteer fire department district.
Section 3. KRS 75A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon the creation of a district, the board of trustees of a district may[are
authorized to] provide fire services, emergency medical services subject to
KRS Chapter 311A, or rescue services pursuant to KRS Chapter 39F, as
provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection[, and to levy a tax upon the
property in the district].
(b) The board may levy a tax upon the property in the district. The property
taxed shall be subject to county tax, and the tax levied by the board upon
creation of the district shall be approved by the county fiscal court,
consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified local
government having jurisdiction over the district at the time of passage of the
ordinance creating the district. Except as provided in Section 4 of this Act,
Page 11 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
the tax shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10) per one hundred dollars ($100) of
valuation as assessed for county taxes, for the purpose of defraying the
expenses for the provision of fire services or rescue services. The rate set in
this subsection shall not be subject to[apply, notwithstanding the provisions
of] KRS 132.023.
(c) The district that establishes and operates an emergency ambulance service and
is the primary service provider in the district may levy a tax upon the property
in the district. The tax to be levied shall be proposed by the board, shall be
approved by the county fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter
county government, or unified local government having jurisdiction over the
district, and except as provided in Section 4 of this Act, the tax shall not
exceed twenty cents ($0.20) per one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as
assessed for county taxes, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the
provision of fire services, emergency medical services, or rescue service, or to
make contracts for fire protection for the districts as provided in KRS 75.050.
The rate set in this subsection shall not be subject to[apply, notwithstanding]
KRS 132.023.
(d) [1. ]Except for the rate initially levied upon the creation of the district,
any increase of the total tax[ levy beyond the rate initially approved by the
board and authorized by the county fiscal court, consolidated local
government, charter county government, or unified local government] shall
not exceed the tax rate levied for the immediately preceding calendar year
by more than two cents ($0.02) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed
valuation.
(e) The rates set in this subsection shall not be subject to KRS 132.023[. Any increase
in excess of the annual compensating rate for the consolidated emergency services
district shall require the approval of the county fiscal court, consolidated local
Page 12 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
government, charter county government, or unified local government having
jurisdiction over the district. If at any time an election resulting from a recall
petition pursuant to KRS 132.017 is required, the question shall be presented to all
voters in every precinct for which any part of the precinct is served by the district
subject to the recall petition].
(2)[2.] If two (2) or more established consolidated emergency services merge to
create a new consolidated emergency services district, as authorized in this chapter,
the initial tax to be levied, as proposed by the board, shall be approved by the
county fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter county government, or
unified local government having jurisdiction over the district, and the initial tax
levied shall not exceed the highest tax rate currently levied by one (1) of the
merging districts. Any increase to the initial tax rate shall be subject to KRS
132.023. Any increase in excess of the annual compensating rate for the
consolidated emergency services district shall require the approval of the county
fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified
local government having jurisdiction over the district. If at any time an election
resulting from a recall petition pursuant to KRS 132.017 is required, the question
shall be presented to all voters in every precinct for which any part of the district
serves.
(3)[(2)] The property valuation administrator of the county in which the district is
created, with the cooperation of the board, shall note on the tax rolls the taxpayers
and valuation of the property subject to such assessment. The county clerk shall
compute the tax on the regular state and county tax bills in such manner as may be
directed by regulation of the Department of Revenue.
(4)[(3)] These taxes shall be subject to the same delinquency date, discounts,
penalties, and interest as are applied to the collection of ad valorem taxes and shall
be collected by the sheriff of the county involved and accounted for to the treasurer
Page 13 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
of the district. The sheriff shall be entitled to a fee of the amount collected by him
or her. The fiscal court shall, by[in the] ordinance [set forth in subsection (2) of this
section ]and in consultation with the sheriff and the consolidated emergency
services district, set a collection fee for the sheriff in an amount not to exceed four
and one-fourth percent (4.25%).
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 75A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board of trustees of a district may exceed the maximum tax rate established
in Section 3 of this Act if the requirements of this section are satisfied.
(2) (a) The board of trustees of a district proposing to levy a tax rate that exceeds
both the maximum tax rate established in Section 3 of this Act and the rate
levied for the immediately preceding calendar year shall hold a public
hearing within thirty (30) days of proposing the levy to hear comments from
the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be open to the
public, and all persons desiring to be heard shall be given an opportunity to
present oral testimony.
(b) Notification of the public hearing shall be advertised for two (2) consecutive
weeks in a newspaper pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 and on the website of
the district. If the district does not have a website, the notification shall be
advertised on the website of the local government in which the district is
located. The notification shall provide:
1. The tax rate levied for the immediately preceding calendar year, and
the revenue produced by that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current calendar year and the revenue
expected to be produced by that rate;
3. A time and place for the public hearing;
4. The purpose of the public hearing;
Page 14 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
5. The purpose of the tax rate increase, which shall be related to
protecting life and property by:
a. Responding to fires;
b. Conducting fire prevention education; or
c. Providing emergency medical or rescue services to the
community; and
6. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained
therein.
(c) If the board of trustees of a district fails to comply with the public hearing
requirements in this subsection, the proposed tax rate shall not go into
effect and the tax rate from the immediately preceding calendar year shall
be levied.
(d) The rates set in this subsection shall not be subject to KRS 132.023.
(e) Except for the rate initially levied upon the creation of the district, any
increase of the total tax shall not exceed the tax rate levied for the
immediately preceding calendar year by more than two cents ($0.02) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation.
(3) In addition to the hearing and notification requirements in subsection (2) of this
section, any increase of the total tax that is proposed to be levied shall be subject
to recall as provided in subsections (4) to (6) of this section.
(4) (a) The portion of the tax rate that is in excess of the rate levied for the
immediately preceding calendar year shall go into effect forty-five (45) days
after its passage by the board of trustees.
(b) During the same forty-five (45) day time period provided by paragraph (a)
of this subsection, any three (3) qualified voters who reside in the district,
may commence petition proceedings to protest the increase in the tax rate by
Page 15 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
filing an affidavit with the county clerk, which states:
1. The three (3) qualified voters constitute the members of the petition
committee;
2. The petition committee will be responsible for circulating the petition;
3. The petition committee will file the petition in the proper form within
the same forty-five (45) day time period provided by paragraph (a) of
this subsection;
4. The names and addresses of the petition committee members;
5. The address to which all notices to the committee are to be sent; and
6. Whether or not the petition committee is willing to incur all of the
expenses associated with the electronic petition signatures. If the
petition committee is not willing to incur all of the expenses, then
electronic petition signatures shall not be allowed for the petition.
(c) Upon receipt of the affidavit, the county clerk shall immediately:
1. Notify the petition committee of all statutory requirements for the
filing of a valid petition under this section;
2. Notify the petition committee that the county clerk will publish a
notice identifying the tax levy being challenged and providing the
names and addresses of the petition committee in a newspaper of
general circulation within the county if:
a. There is a newspaper within the county in which to publish the
notice; and
b. The petition committee remits an amount equal to the cost of
publishing the notice determined in accordance with KRS
424.160 at the time of filing the affidavit.
If the petition committee elects to have the notice published, the
county clerk shall publish the notice within five (5) days of receipt of
Page 16 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
the affidavit; and
3. Deliver a copy of the affidavit to the board of trustees of the district
proposing to levy the tax.
(d) The petition shall meet the following requirements:
1. All papers of the petition shall be substantially uniform in size and
style and shall be assembled in one (1) instrument for filing;
2. Each sheet of the petition may contain the names of voters from more
than one (1) voting precinct;
3. Each nonelectronic petition signature shall be executed in ink or
indelible pencil;
4. Each electronic petition signature shall comply with the requirements
of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, KRS 369.101 to 369.120;
5. Each petition signature shall be followed by the printed name, street
address, birth month, and birth year of the person signing; and
6. a. The petition shall be signed by a number of registered and
qualified voters who reside in the district equal to at least ten
percent (10%) of the total number of votes cast in the last
preceding presidential election.
b. Electronic petition signatures shall be included in determining
whether the required number of petition signatures has been
obtained when:
i. The expenses associated with the electronic petition
signatures have been incurred in accordance with
paragraph (b)6. of this subsection; and
ii. The electronic petition signatures comply with the
requirements of this subsection.
c. The inclusion of an invalid petition signature on a page shall not
Page 17 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
invalidate the entire page of the petition, but shall instead result
in the invalid petition signature being stricken and not counted.
(e) Upon the filing of the petition with the county clerk, the measure passed by
the board of trustees levying the increased tax rate shall be suspended from
going into effect until after the election referred to in subsection (5) of this
section is held, or until the petition is finally determined to be insufficient
and no further action may be taken pursuant to paragraph (i) of this
subsection.
(f) The county clerk shall immediately notify the chair of the board of trustees
that the petition has been received and shall, within thirty (30) days of the
receipt of the petition, make a determination of whether the petition
contains enough signatures of qualified voters to place the measure levying
the tax rate before those persons eligible to vote for elective offices of the
members of the board of trustees in the elections held under KRS 75A.030.
(g) If the county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient, the clerk shall certify to
the petition committee and the board of trustees within the thirty (30) day
period provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection that the petition is
properly presented and in compliance with this section, and that the
measure of the board of trustees levying the tax rate will be placed before
those persons eligible to vote for elective offices of the members of the board
of trustees in the elections held under KRS 75A.030.
(h) If the county clerk finds the petition to be insufficient, the clerk shall, within
the thirty (30) day period provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection
notify, in writing, the petition committee and the board of trustees of the
specific deficiencies found. Notification shall be sent by certified mail and
shall be published at least one (1) time in a newspaper of general
circulation within the county containing the district. If there is not a
Page 18 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
newspaper within the county in which to publish the notification, then the
notification shall be posted at the courthouse door.
(i) A final determination of the sufficiency of a petition shall be subject to final
review by the Circuit Court of the county in which the district is located, and
shall be limited to the validity of the county clerk's determination. Any
petition challenging the county clerk's final determination shall be filed
within ten (10) days of the issuance of the county clerk's final
determination.
(j) The board of trustees may cause the cancellation of the election by
reconsidering and amending the measure levying the tax rate to a rate equal
to or lower than the previous year's rate. The action by the board of trustees
shall be valid only if taken within fifteen (15) days following the date the
county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient.
(5) (a) If an election is necessary under subsection (4) of this section:
1. The board of trustees shall cause to be submitted to those persons
eligible to vote for elective offices of the members of the board of
trustees in the elections held under KRS 75A.030 the question as to
whether the property tax rate shall be levied;
2. This question shall be advertised in accordance with KRS 424.120 and
shall be advertised at least thirty (30) days prior to the election held to
elect the elective offices of members of the board of trustees under
KRS 75A.030. The question shall also appear on the website of the fire
protection district or volunteer fire department district. If the district
does not have a website, the notification shall be advertised on the
website of the local government in which the district is located;
3. The vote shall occur at the election held to elect the elective offices of
members of the board of trustees under KRS 75A.030 on the fourth
Page 19 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
Saturday of June;
4. The board of trustees shall ensure that the ballots are secure and are
counted and retained by two (2) or more persons who shall count and
report the results to the chair of the board of trustees; and
5. All ballots and other materials pertinent to the election shall be
retained by the board of trustees for twenty-two (22) months after the
election day, after which time they shall be destroyed in a manner to
render them unreadable by the board of trustees if no contest or
recount action has been filed. The board of trustees shall, by bylaw,
establish methods for contests and recount actions.
(b) In an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the question
shall be framed to ask whether the persons eligible to vote for elective
offices of the members of the board of trustees in the elections held under
KRS 75A.030 are for the levy of the property tax rate. If a majority of the
votes cast upon the question oppose its passage, the measure of the board of
trustees levying the tax rate shall not go into effect. If a majority of the votes
cast upon the question favor its passage, the measure shall become effective.
(c) If the measure of the board of trustees levying the tax rate fails to pass
pursuant to an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
property tax rate from the previous year shall be levied without further
approval by the board of trustees.
(d) Local, state, and federal tax dollars shall not be used to advocate, in partial
terms, for or against any public question that appears on the ballot under
this subsection. For purposes of this paragraph, "local" means and
includes any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local
government, unified local government, charter county, or special district.
(6) Notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary, if a board of trustees of a
Page 20 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
district has not established a final tax rate as of September 15 due to the recall
provisions of this section:
(a) Regular tax bills shall be prepared as required in KRS 132.017 and 133.220
for all districts having a tax rate established by that date; and
(b) A second set of bills shall be prepared and collected in the regular manner
in accordance with KRS Chapter 132 upon establishment of the final tax
rate by the district.
(7) If a second billing is necessary, the collection period shall be extended to conform
with the second billing date.
(8) All costs associated with the second billing shall be paid by the district.
Section 5. KRS 75.015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A fire protection subdistrict may be formed according to the provisions of this
section. A fire protection subdistrict shall:
(a) Be located within the territorial limits of a fire protection district or volunteer
fire department district;
(b) Have a continuous boundary; and
(c) Be managed by the board of trustees of the district, which shall:
1. Impose an ad valorem tax on property in the subdistrict in addition to
the ad valorem tax the board imposes on property in the district as a
whole; and
2. Expend the revenue from that additional tax on improved fire protection
facilities and services for the subdistrict.
(2) Persons desiring to form a fire protection subdistrict shall present a petition to the
fiscal court clerk and to each member of the fiscal court. The petition shall be
accompanied by a map and a metes and bounds description or other description
which specifically identifies the boundaries of the proposed subdistrict. The petition
shall be signed by more than sixty percent (60%) of the persons who both:
Page 21 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
(a) Live within the proposed subdistrict; and
(b) Own property that is located within the proposed subdistrict and is subject to
taxation by the district under KRS 75.040.
(3) The petition shall contain the name and address of each petitioner and the address
of each petitioner's property that is located within the proposed subdistrict. It shall
be in substantially the following form: "The following owners of property located
within (insert the name of the fire protection district or volunteer fire department
district) hereby petition the fiscal court to form a fire protection subdistrict located
at (insert a brief description of the location of the proposed subdistrict). The board
of trustees of (insert the name of the fire protection district or volunteer fire
department district) shall have the authority to impose a special ad valorem tax of
(insert amount, not to exceed the maximum allowed under subsection (6) of this
section) on each one hundred dollars ($100) worth of property assessed for local
taxation in the subdistrict, in order to provide enhanced fire protection for the
subdistrict. This tax shall be in addition to the ad valorem tax imposed by the
trustees on the district as a whole."
(4) Upon receipt of the petition, the fiscal court shall hold a hearing and provide
notification in the manner required for creation of a taxing district under KRS
65.182(2) to (5). Following the hearing, the fiscal court shall set forth its written
findings of fact and shall approve or disapprove the formation of the subdistrict.
The creation of the subdistrict shall be of legal effect only upon the adoption of an
ordinance in accordance with the provisions of KRS 67.075 to 67.077. A certified
copy of the ordinance creating the subdistrict shall be filed with the county clerk.
(5) Upon the creation of a fire protection subdistrict, the trustees shall levy a tax, not to
exceed the amount stated in the petition, on the property in the subdistrict, for the
purpose of improving fire protection facilities and services in the subdistrict.
(6) The tax levied under this section, combined with the tax for fire and emergency
Page 22 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
services levied on the entire district under KRS 75.040, shall not exceed:
(a) Ten cents ($0.10) per one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for
county taxes if neither the fire district nor the fire subdistrict operates an
emergency ambulance service under KRS 75.040; or
(b) Twenty cents ($0.20) per one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed
for county taxes if either the fire district or fire subdistrict operates an
emergency ambulance service under KRS 75.040.
At no time shall the trustees increase either of these taxes so that the combined total
exceeds this limit.
(7) The county clerk shall add the levy to the tax bills of the affected property owners.
For taxing purposes, the effective date of the tax levy shall be January 1 of the year
following the certification and creation of the subdistrict. The tax shall be
administered in the same manner as the tax on the entire district under KRS
75.040[(2) and ](3) and (4).
(8) The board of trustees shall not reduce the tax rate imposed on property in the
district as a whole as a result of receiving extra revenue from the additional tax on
property in the subdistrict. The trustees shall expend the extra revenue solely on
improving fire protection facilities and services in the subdistrict and shall not
expend the extra revenue on facilities or services that are shared by the entire
district.
(9) Fire subdistrict taxes shall be placed on the tax bill in a place separate from the bill
of the fire district tax so that ratepayers can ascertain the amount of each tax and its
rate.
(10) The sheriff shall separately account to the fire district for the funds collected for
each subdistrict within the fire district.
(11) Fire districts shall maintain a separate accounting of all subdistrict funds, and if
there is more than one (1) subdistrict, a separate accounting for each subdistrict.
Page 23 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2117
Section 6. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 24 of 24
XXXX 2/10/2026 11:14 AM Jacketed